Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) Subject to the requirements and conditions set forth  in subsection (3)
of this section, any  person with 50 or fewer employees may submit to the Oregon Business
Development Department an application  to borrow moneys from the Small Business Expan-
sion Loan Fund established under section 2 of this 2018 Act for the purpose of obtaining early
stage growth capital  when adequate traditional commercial or private financing is not readily
available to the applicant.  The application must be submitted in the manner, and contain or
be accompanied by the information, prescribed by the department by rule.
(2) The department may  charge fees in connection with an application submitted under
this section and, if the application is approved, with processing and monitoring  a loan
agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (4) of  this section. Fees collected must be
deposited in the Small Business Expansion Loan Fund and may be used  to pay the adminis-
trative costs  and expenses of the department in administering the fund and implementing the
provisions of this section and section 2 of this 2018 Act.
(3) Upon receipt of  an application submitted under this section, the department shall
determine whether  the applicant is eligible to receive a loan from the Small Business Ex-
pansion Loan Fund established under section 2 of this 2018 Act. The department may approve
an application if, after investigation, the department finds that:
(a) The applicant operates a business with 50  or fewer employees that is in the traded
sector, as defined in ORS 285A.010, or that primarily supports traded sector industries;
(b) The loan has a reasonable prospect of repayment;
(c) The applicant demonstrates a  reasonable potential for high growth that may support
economic diversification of the state or the region in which  the business is conducted, or
increase employment opportunities or retain existing jobs in the state or region;
(d) The applicant demonstrates readiness for market; and
(e) There is or will be a  sufficient amount of moneys in the Small Business Expansion
Loan Fund to make a loan to the applicant.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-B) Page 1
(4) If the department  approves an application under this section, the department and the
applicant shall enter into a loan agreement that provides, at a minimum, the following:
(a) That loan proceeds  may be used only to support acquisition of business assets or to
pay for business operating expenses. Loan proceeds may not be used to  refinance personal
debt or debt not used for business purposes.
(b) A  plan for repayment of moneys borrowed from the Small Business Expansion Loan
Fund. The  department may specify the terms of repayment, singly or in any combination,
by royalties, on the  basis of a percentage of business revenues, by installment payments of
principal, installment payments of interest or installment payments  of both principal and
interest, or otherwise. The plan must set forth a schedule  of payments, the term of the loan
and the manner of determining  when loan payments are delinquent. The department, in its
sole discretion, shall establish the terms of repayment,  which must be structured so that the
repayment plan and pricing:
(A) Based on the total  repayment costs, do not directly compete with traditional com-
mercial lending services;
(B) Are commensurate with the risk taken by the department when  making a loan to the
applicant; and
(C) To the greatest extent possible, are anticipated to cover operational expenses and
losses that the department may incur in the administration of the loan program.
(c) That the loan must be secured by sufficient collateral and security.  The department
may specify by rule the types of collateral and security that are acceptable to secure repay-
ment of the loan, including but not limited to personal  guarantees, business or corporate
guarantees and pledges of business and personal assets.
(d) That the liability of  the state under the agreement may not exceed the availability
of moneys in the Small Business Expansion Loan Fund.
(5)(a) The Director of the Oregon Business  Development Department, or the director’s
designee, may approve loans of up  to $250,000 each. Loans greater than $250,000 each may
be approved by the  Oregon Business Development Commission, or the commission’s
designee. No loan may be made for an amount greater than $2 million.
(b) Immediately upon receiving loan proceeds, a successful applicant shall pay to the de-
partment an amount equal  to one and one-half percent of the principal amount of the loan,
for deposit in the Small Business Expansion Loan Fund.
(6) Up to 20 percent of  all moneys available for lending in the Small Business Expansion
Loan Fund on July 1 of each fiscal year may be reserved for loans to applicants who  are in-
dividuals considered to have low to moderate household income and low to moderate personal
net worth, as defined by the department by rule, and who operate businesses:
(a) Controlled and with at least 51 percent ownership interest  in the business by minor-
ities, women or honorably discharged veterans; or
(b) That are located outside of the Portland, Oregon, Metropolitan Statistical Area.
(7)(a) The department shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.  Be-
fore adopting rules under this paragraph, the department shall consult with a representative
from an association representing banks in this state.
(b) The department may adopt rules that  establish preferences in making loans under
this section to individuals or businesses owned by  individuals in underserved communities
and in rural communities that may have insufficient access to diverse types of capital  and
traditional commercial or private financing.
(c) The department may adopt  rules establishing a loan amount limit of less than $2
million for purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Small Business Expansion Loan Fund is established  in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Small Busi-
ness Expansion Loan Fund shall be credited  to the fund. All moneys in the fund are contin-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-B) Page 2
uously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department for the  following
purposes:
(a) Payment of loans to applicants approved under section 1 of this 2018 Act.
(b) Payments to local development groups for the purposes of this section.  A payment
under this paragraph may not exceed one percent of the principal  loan amount from which
payment is required under section 1 (5)(b) of this 2018 Act.
(c) Administrative  costs of the department incurred in marketing the loan program,
processing loan applications, investigating eligibility of applicants  and servicing outstanding
loans.
(2) The Small Business Expansion Loan Fund consists of:
(a) Fees collected by the department under section 1 of this 2018 Act;
(b) Payments required under section 1 (5)(b) of this 2018 Act;
(c) Moneys repaid by recipients of loans from the fund, including interest on those mon-
eys and other receipts;
(d) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(e) Moneys transferred to the fund  by the Oregon Business Development Commission
from the Oregon Business Development Fund pursuant to section 3 of this 2018 Act;
(f) Income earned on moneys in the Small Business Expansion Loan Fund;
(g) Moneys transferred to the fund from the federal government,  other state agencies
or local governments; and
(h) Any gifts or donations made to the State of Oregon for deposit in the fund.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if  at any time there are insufficient funds
in established business finance  programs, the department may direct the transfer of unobli-
gated funds from the Small Business Expansion Loan Fund.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Business Development Commission may transfer moneys  cred-
ited to  the Oregon Business Development Fund created under ORS 285B.092 to the Small
Business Expansion Loan Fund  established under section 2 of this 2018 Act when the com-
mission determines that the transfer is reasonable and financially appropriate and would not
impair the making of loans  under ORS 285B.050 to 285B.098. Moneys transferred under this
section shall be used by  the Oregon Business Development Department for the purpose of
making loans under section 1 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 285B.092 is amended to read:
285B.092. (1) There is created within the State Treasury a revolving fund known as the  Oregon
Business Development Fund, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Oregon Business Development  Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in [ this] the fund are
continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Commission for the following pur-
poses:
(a) Administrative expenses of the commission  in marketing public business finance, processing
applications, investigating proposed business development projects and  servicing outstanding loans.
In any  one year, administrative expenses charged under this paragraph may not be greater than the
total revenues received in that year from fees  provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section, plus
four percent of the total asset value of the fund.
(b) Payment of loans to applicants under ORS 285B.050 to 285B.098.
(c) Transfer of moneys to the  Small Business Expansion Loan Fund established under
section 2 of this 2018 Act in accordance with section 3 of this 2018 Act.
[(c)] (d) Actions the commission deems necessary to obtain repayment of outstanding loans.
[(d)] (e) Purchase or buyout of superior or prior liens or mortgages on or a security  interest in
any business development project financed in part by a loan from  the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Fund, when the commission determines:
(A) A  loan from the fund is in default and is in liquidation or at risk of being forced into liqui-
dation by another creditor to the project; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-B) Page 3
(B) The action  is necessary to maintain or enhance the value of the commission’s collateral in
the project.
(2) The fund created by subsection (1) of this section shall consist of:
(a) Fees as determined by the commission.
(b) Repayment of moneys loaned to  counties, municipalities or persons from the fund, including
interest on those moneys or including other receipts.
(c) Payment of such moneys as may be appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(d) Moneys obtained from any interest accrued from funds.
(e) Moneys from any grant made to the fund by any federal agency.
(3) All repayments, interest and other receipts from outstanding indebtedness or any other
source shall be retained and accumulated in the fund and shall be used for the purposes of  the fund.
(4) Notwithstanding  any other provision of law, if at any time there are insufficient funds in
established business finance programs, the commission may direct the transfer  of unobligated funds
from the Oregon Business Development  Fund.
Passed by Senate March 1, 2018
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-B) Page 4